parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/flex-rules.xfst
# ============================================================================
# TYPE:		(x)fst script
# CONTENT:      basic rules for additional lexicon entries
# 
# LANGUAGE:     ITALIAN
#
# AUTHOR:       A.Schiller
#
# CREATED:      14-May-2007
#
# ============================================================================
# USAGE:        xfst -e "read lex LEX.lexc"  -l [ThisFile]
# ============================================================================



define LEX

# apostrophe
define APO [
  "\u0027"	# [']	APOSTROPHE
| "\u2018"	# [‘]	LEFT SINGLE QUOTATION MARK
| "\u2019"	# [’]	RIGHT SINGLE QUOTATION MARK
];


# identify tags and markers
read regex LEX ;
single char sigma net
define SIG
read regex SIG & [%+ ?+ ];
multi char sigma net
define TAG

define CHAR SIG & ? ;


define MARKER 	"[*]" | "[-]"| "(-)" | "(.)" | "[h]" ;

define LBD	[ "^]" ];	# lemma boundary
define CBD	[ "^=" ];	# token boundary, e.g. alla::a+Prep^=lo+Art+Def+Fem+Sg

define SPEC	[ LBD | MARKER ] ;

define VOWEL	[a|e|i|o|u|é|ì];


# ==============================================================================
read regex [
	0 <- SPEC

# optional hyphens
.o.	%- <- [ "[-]" | "(-)" ]

# optional dots
.o.	%. <- "(.)"

# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
.o.	%+Adj | %+Noun <- %+NAdj
 
.o.	LEX 

# introduce lemma boundary for regular nouns/adjectives
.o.	[..] -> LBD || CHAR _ %+NAdj | %+Adj | %+Noun  

# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# 
# hyphen or space
.o.	"[-]" -> [ %  | %- ]

# hyphen or nothing
.o.	"(-)" -> [ 0 | %- ]

# optional dots
.o.	"(.)" -> [ 0 | %. ]

# regular adjective/noun inflection
.o.	a LBD -> PHON i	|| _  $%+Masc $%+Pl	# belga -> belgi
.o.	a LBD -> PHON e	|| _  $%+Fem $%+Pl	# yemanita -> yemenite

.o.	o LBD -> a	|| _ $%+Fem $%+Sg	# italiano -> italiana
.o.	(i) o LBD @-> PHON i	|| _ $%+Masc $%+Pl	# italiano -> italiani, vario -> vari
.o.	o LBD -> PHON e || _ $%+Fem $%+Pl	# italiano -> italiane

.o.	{tore} -> {trice}  || _ LBD $%+Fem	# armatore -> armatrice
.o.	e LBD -> i	|| _ $%+Pl		# francese -> francesi

# phonological changes
.o.	PHON -> h	|| [c|g] _ e		# belghe, turche
.o.	"[h]" PHON -> h	|| [c|g] _ i		# turchi, BUT: belgi, greci
.o.	PHON -> 0

# ----------------------------------------------------------------------
# final elision
.o.	VOWEL -> APO || _ TAG* %+Elided

# ----------------------------------------------------------------------
# acronyms
# S.p.A. -> S.p.A. SpA, spa, s.p.a., S.P.A., ....

.o.	%.(->) 0,
	A (->) a, B (->) b, C (->) c, D (->) d, E (->) e, F (->) f, 
	G (->) g, H (->) h, I (->) i, J (->) j, K (->) k, L (->) l, 
	M (->) m, N (->) n, O (->) o, P (->) p, Q (->) q, R (->) r, 
	S (->) s, T (->) t, U (->) u, V (->) v, W (->) w, X (->) x, 
	Y (->) y, Z (->) z,
	À (->) à, È (->) è, É (->) é, Ì (->) ì, Ò (->) ò, Ù (->) ù
        || _ $%+Acron


# ----------------------------------------------------------------------
# remove tags and markers
.o.	[SPEC|TAG] -> 0

	

# for place names
.o. 	{Sant} (->) S t || _ [o|a] [ %- | %  ]

];
